Tennessee, session 114, SB2549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-11-311(j)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B) Is employed by, contracts with, or subcontracts through the contracted
healthcare vendor with the department of correction or a county or municipal jail to
provide healthcare services;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2549
011944
- 1 -